Massachusetts, session 194th, H4177.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all positions in the
police department of the town of Lancaster shall be exempt from chapter 31 of the General
Laws.
Section 2. This act shall not impair the civil service status of a person holding position
described in section 1 on the effective date of this act.
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1